North Carolina, session 2025, HB1163.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE AND INTRODUCTION
SECTION 1.(a) Title. – This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Workforce
Act of 2026."
SECTION 1.(b) Introduction. – The appropriations made in this act are for the
amounts necessary to modernize education-to-workforce pathways across the State, to improve
credit acquisition and transfer for students, strengthen career information sharing among
institutions of higher education and employers, and expand employer-recognized credentials to
provide faster, clearer routes to credential completion and career success.

PART II. APPRENTICESHIP NC SUPPORT
SECTION 2.(a) Findings. – The General Assembly finds that work-based learning
is of value to learners as well as employers; that apprenticeship is a highly effective work-based
learning model and provides a significant return on investment; that continued growth of
apprenticeship is important to the State's economy; that ApprenticeshipNC is critical to
increasing the number of employers participating in apprenticeships as well as the number of
registered apprentices in North Carolina; that continued growth of apprenticeship is at risk
without adequate support for ApprenticeshipNC; and that additional State support is necessary
to sustain apprenticeship growth.
SECTION 2.(b) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Community Colleges System Office the sum of three million one hundred thousand dollars
($3,100,000) in recurring funds beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the administration
of the ApprenticeshipNC program.

PART III. NC WORKFORCE CREDENTIALS

NC WORKFORCE CREDENTIALS OPERATIONAL EXPENSES AND STAFFING
SECTION 3.1.(a) Findings. – The General Assembly finds that, due to the critical
importance to the State of identifying industry-valued credentials, promoting programs of study
*H1163-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
leading to industry-valued credentials, and aligning industry-valued credentials and programs of
study leading to those credentials with federal Workforce Pell Grant implementation, it is
necessary that the State provide funds to the Department of Commerce (Department) to develop
and maintain a list of industry-valued credentials, to continually determine programs of study to
meet workforce needs, and to ensure alignment to federal Workforce Pell Grants.
SECTION 3.1.(b) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department the sum of three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) in recurring funds,
beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year, for operational expenses and staffing to support NC
Workforce Credentials in accordance with this section and G.S. 143B-438.10.
SECTION 3.1.(c) Data Coordination. – The Department shall engage with
employers to provide workforce data and participate in efforts to link data on industry-valued
credentials to labor market outcomes, including:
(1) Labor market demand.
(2) Job placement and Standard Occupational Classification or similar data
reflecting employment-in-field.
(3) Wage outcomes.
(4) Stackability capacity for credentials to count toward and build into more
advanced career credentials.
(5) Work location, collected on a voluntary basis and in a manner consistent with
applicable State and federal privacy protections, to support aggregated
analysis of regional workforce outcomes, talent retention, and analysis of
education and career pathways alignment with local labor market demand.
SECTION 3.1.(d) Stakeholder Consultation. – As part of its efforts to link data on
industry-valued credentials to labor market outcomes, the Department shall consult with the
North Carolina Community Colleges System Office, The University of North Carolina System
Office, and other relevant interested parties to ensure alignment with rules and regulations
pertaining to federal Workforce Pell Grants and to take steps to institutionalize workforce data
sharing across State government.
SECTION 3.1.(e) Longitudinal Data. – As part of its efforts to link data on
industry-valued credentials to labor market outcomes, the Department shall require issuers of
those credentials to submit data pertaining to credentials issued to the North Carolina
Collaboratory and the North Carolina Longitudinal Data System for inclusion in the System's
Licenses and Credentials Data Warehouse to enhance the State's ability to retrieve and link those
data to labor market outcomes.
SECTION 3.1.(f) Wage-Outcome Prioritization. – In developing and maintaining
the list of industry-valued credentials, the Department shall give substantial weight to
demonstrated wage outcomes and evidence that credential attainment provides a positive return
on investment for students.
SECTION 3.1.(g) Outreach. – Of the funds appropriated to the Department under
subsection (b) of this section, the Department may use up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) each
fiscal year for outreach and communications consistent with the purposes of this section,
including to contract with non-State entities for outreach and communications.

ADDITIONAL FUNDS FOR SHORT-TERM WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
GRANTS
SECTION 3.2.(a) Findings. – The General Assembly finds that, due to the critical
need in this State to provide financial aid for students pursuing industry-valued credentials,
including in programs of study that are not eligible for federal Workforce Pell Grants, it is in the
State's interest to provide an increase of funds to the North Carolina Community College
Short-Term Workforce Development Grant Program.
SECTION 3.2.(b) G.S. 115D-10.19 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
Page 2 House Bill 1163-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(e) Administrative Costs. – The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office may
use up to four percent (4%) of the funds appropriated for the Program for administrative costs
associated with administration of the Program."
SECTION 3.2.(c) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Community Colleges System Office the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring
funds beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the Short-Term Workforce Development
Grant Program.

PART IV. SEAMLESS POSTSECONDARY TRANSFER

INCLUDE NORTH CAROLINA INDEPENDENT COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES IN
COMMON DIGITAL TRANSCRIPT
SECTION 4.1. The State Education Assistance Authority, in consultation with the
Department of Public Instruction, the Community Colleges System Office, The University of
North Carolina System Office, the North Carolina Independent Colleges and Universities, the
College Foundation, Inc., and the Department of Information Technology, shall incorporate the
private colleges and universities located in this State into the common digital transcript developed
pursuant to Section 8A.15 of S.L. 2023-134. No later than March 15, 2027, the Authority shall
report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the progress made toward this
goal, including at least the following information:
(1) Any additional steps to be taken for this purpose and a time line for completing
those steps and publishing the transcript to students enrolled at private
colleges and universities in this State.
(2) Estimates of any additional costs needed to expand the common digital
transcript to private colleges and universities.

EXPANSION OF POSTSECONDARY TRANSFER TECHNOLOGY
SECTION 4.2.(a) Findings. – The General Assembly makes the following findings
regarding the current state of postsecondary transfer technology at institutions of higher
education in North Carolina:
(1) Seamless postsecondary transfer and reverse transfer reduces barriers for
learners and aligns to statewide economic and workforce goals.
(2) The Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2023, S.L. 2023-134,
authorized and supported statewide postsecondary data and technology
initiatives to improve student outcomes, including transfer efficiency.
(3) Expanding technology to support the transfer of student credits among and
between institutions of higher education will reduce the time it takes for
students to earn a degree and reduce costs.
(4) Successful postsecondary transfer and reverse transfer is necessary to achieve
the postsecondary attainment goal established in G.S. 116C-10.
(5) Additional investment is necessary to scale and integrate technology
supporting seamless postsecondary transfer and reverse transfer.
SECTION 4.2.(b) Initiative; Administration. – For the 2026-2027 academic year,
The University of North Carolina System Office, in collaboration with the Community Colleges
System Office and the Department of Information Technology, shall expand the current initiative
(Initiative) to accelerate the transfer of course credits among postsecondary institutions of higher
education using postsecondary transfer technology. This expanded Initiative shall provide and
improve technology at participating institutions of higher education that will simplify the credit
transfer process for students, advisors, and the participating institutions. The expanded Initiative
shall allow students to easily compare credit transfer options, speed up student decision making,
House Bill 1163-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and streamline transfer planning and progress toward degrees in a manner that reduces overall
costs for students in the State.
SECTION 4.2.(c) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the Information
Technology Reserve to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of
two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year for the expanded Initiative described in subsection (b) of this section. The University
of North Carolina System Office shall use these funds to identify and develop programs to
accelerate the transfer of course credits among postsecondary institutions of higher education in
accordance with this section.
SECTION 4.2.(d) Report. – No later than March 15, 2027, The University of North
Carolina System Office shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on
the Initiative, including at least the following information:
(1) The number and identity of institutions participating in the Initiative.
(2) The progress of each participating institution in the following areas, with data
disaggregated on the basis of income, race, ethnicity, and other demographic
characteristics, where available:
a. Enrollments upon transfer.
b. Credentials attained as a result of the successful transfer of credits.
(3) Recommendations to scale credit mobility and transfer technology statewide,
including identification of data system needs and opportunities to further
reduce the time it takes for a student to receive a degree and any other student
costs.

PART V. NC CAREERS ENHANCEMENT
SECTION 5.(a) Findings. – The General Assembly finds that (i) maintaining a
high-quality, up-to-date central platform to disseminate information on career exploration, career
planning, and alignment of education to career pathways to meet workforce needs is a statewide
priority, (ii) NC Careers provides such a platform, (iii) enhancing NC Careers is essential to the
effective implementation of the provisions of G.S. 115C-158.10, and (iv) it is necessary that the
State provide funds to the Department of Commerce to enhance NC Careers and its ability to
serve as North Carolina's premier workforce information and career navigation resource for
students, parents, educators, jobseekers, and career counselors in accordance with this section.
SECTION 5.(b) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the Information
Technology Reserve to the Department of Commerce the nonrecurring sum of two hundred
thousand dollars ($200,000) and the recurring sum of five hundred eighty-five thousand dollars
($585,000), beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year, to contract with Year13, Inc. (Year13), to
replatform, host, and maintain the NC Careers website, utilizing the Year13 proprietary system.
The contract shall, at a minimum, require Year13 to operationalize its platform to serve as the
unified infrastructure for NC Careers, with build-outs prioritizing functionality that supports
individualized career planning, integration with programs of study and industry-related
credentials, information on licensure requirements as applicable, and use by career counselors,
advisors, and coaches embedded throughout a learner's experience across education and
workforce systems.

PART VI. NORTH CAROLINA COLLABORATORY TO EVALUATE AND REPORT
ON THE WORKFORCE ACT OF 2026
SECTION 6.(a) The North Carolina Collaboratory (Collaboratory) shall evaluate
the programs and initiatives established in Parts I through V of this act each academic year
through the 2029-2030 academic year. The Collaboratory shall report the results of its evaluation
to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by March 15 of each year through March
15, 2030. Each report shall include the following information:
Page 4 House Bill 1163-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The total number of students and adult learners engaging with each program
or initiative established in this act.
(2) The total funds expended to implement, design, and operate each program or
initiative.
(3) The effects of the programs and initiatives in this act on achieving
postsecondary attainment and workforce outcomes.
SECTION 6.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina for the 2026-2027 fiscal year the sum of six
hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) in nonrecurring funds to be allocated to the North Carolina
Collaboratory to conduct the evaluation and report described in this section.

PART VII. CAREER DEVELOPMENT PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 7.(a) Pilot Program Established; Purpose. – The Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall create an Annual Career Development Plan Pilot Program (Program) for
students entering the seventh grade at select schools during the 2026-2027 and 2027-2028 school
years and continuing through the students' graduation from high school. The purpose of the
Program shall be to evaluate the efficacy of reviewing Career Development Plans (Plans)
annually to better align students for on-time graduation and achievement of college and career
goals and to ensure that all students graduate from high school college or career ready.
SECTION 7.(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply to this section:
(1) Career Development Plan. – An individual plan created by each student that
establishes the student's plan throughout middle and high school for
graduation and career development pursuant to G.S. 115C-158.10.
(2) Local board of education. – A local board of education governing a partnered
school.
(3) Parent. – Defined in G.S. 115C-76.1.
(4) Partnered school. – A middle school and high school governed by a local
board of education where at least half of the student population of the middle
school is assigned to attend the associated high school.
SECTION 7.(c) Partnered Schools. – The Superintendent shall select 12 partnered
schools that are proportionally representative of the population size and geographic distribution
of public high schools in the State. The Superintendent shall provide a process for schools to
apply to participate in the Program as partnered schools. The Superintendent shall be responsible
for the final selection of partnered schools. If there are fewer than 12 applicants, the
Superintendent shall collaborate with local superintendents to select schools to be partnered
schools. Partnered schools shall have each student entering the seventh grade during the
2026-2027 and 2027-2028 school years complete a review of Plans each year until graduating
from high school.
SECTION 7.(d) Local Board of Education and IEP Support. – The local board of
education shall ensure that students in partnered schools are provided assistance by a school
counselor and planning time during the instructional day each school year to update their Plans.
For students with disabilities, the student's IEP team, if applicable, may assist the student in
completing and updating the Plan. Updates to Plans shall be made prior to student scheduling of
courses for the next school year.
SECTION 7.(e) Parental Involvement. – Partnered schools shall encourage parents
to participate in development of Plans with their students and to sign a form provided by the
school acknowledging the annual revisions of the Plans. Local boards of education shall ensure
that Plans are easily accessible to students and parents and shall provide parents (i) annual written
notice of the creation or revision of a Plan, (ii) information on how to access the Plan, (iii) a
listing of course offerings for the next school year with a description of the content of each course,
and (iv) high school graduation requirements where appropriate. Prior to creating or updating a
House Bill 1163-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
student's Plan, a school counselor shall attempt to meet with the student's parent, either in person
or virtually, to explain the possible effects that the Plan might have on the student's graduation
requirements and career development planning. Beginning in the tenth grade and continuing
throughout the student's high school enrollment, a school counselor shall provide each student
and parent information regarding State and federal need-based and merit-based financial aid
programs to support postsecondary education and training using information provided by the
State Education Assistance Authority and College Foundation of North Carolina. The school
counselor shall also provide information on the Federal Free Application for Federal Student Aid
(FAFSA) and its use and notify the parent that information included in the FAFSA is confidential
and not accessible by the school.
SECTION 7.(f) Initial Career Development Plans. – Students entering seventh grade
in partnered schools shall develop an initial Career Development Plan which will provide
guidance as students develop Plans.
SECTION 7.(g) Annual Career Development Plan Updates. – In partnered schools,
Plans shall be updated annually in addition to the following information being provided to
students:
(1) For eighth grade students, by the end of the school year, a list of the required
core courses to be taken in ninth and tenth grade.
(2) For tenth grade students, an identification of the graduation requirements
relevant to the student's chosen postsecondary goals based on the student's
career development planning.
(3) For eleventh grade students not meeting the career and college readiness
standards established by the State Board of Community Colleges, a plan for
enrolling in remedial coursework for his or her senior year.
(4) Any other minimum requirements established by the Superintendent.
SECTION 7.(h) Reporting Requirement. – The North Carolina Collaboratory
(Collaboratory), in collaboration with the superintendent of a local school administrative unit that
has a partnered school participating in the Program, shall develop reporting requirements for
partnered schools participating in the Program to provide information on the effectiveness of the
annual review of the Plans. The Collaboratory shall report to the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee by August 15, 2027, and each year thereafter on the progress of the
Program, including any logistical issues that have arisen with the Program. A final report on the
Program shall be submitted by August 15, 2033.
SECTION 7.(i) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning
with the 2026-2027 school year.

PART VIII. CONSOLIDATED TEACHER BONUS PROGRAM AND REVISE CTE
BONUSES
SECTION 8.(a) Article 20 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding the following new section to read:
"§ 115C-302.9. Teacher bonuses.
(a) Program. – The State Board of Education shall establish a consolidated teacher bonus
program to reward teacher performance and encourage student learning and improvement. To
attain this goal, to the extent funds are made available for this purpose, the Department of Public
Instruction shall administer bonus pay to qualifying teachers whose salaries are supported from
State funds in January of each year, based on data from the prior school year, in accordance with
this section.
(b) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Eligible advanced course teacher. – A teacher of Advanced Placement
courses, International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme courses, or the
Page 6 House Bill 1163-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Cambridge Advanced International Certificate of Education (AICE) program
who meets the following criteria:
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, one or more
of the following:
1. A qualifying public school unit.
2. The North Carolina Virtual Public School program.
b. Taught one or more students who received a score listed in subsection
(c) of this section.
(2) Eligible career and technical education (CTE) teacher. – A teacher who meets
the following criteria:
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a qualifying
public school unit.
b. Taught one or more students who attained industry certifications or
credentials that are approved by the North Carolina Workforce
Credentials Advisory Council.
(3) Eligible growth teacher. – A teacher who meets at least one of the following
criteria:
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a qualifying
public school unit and meets one of the following criteria:
1. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for third
grade reading from the previous school year.
2. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth
or fifth grade reading from the previous school year.
3. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth,
fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics from the
previous school year.
b. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a local school
administrative unit and meets one of the following criteria:
1. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
to the EVAAS student growth index score for third grade
reading from the previous school year.
2. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth or fifth
grade reading from the previous school year.
3. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth, fifth,
sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics from the previous
school year.
c. Was employed by a local school administrative unit that employed in
the previous school year three or fewer total teachers in that teacher's
grade level as long as the teacher has an EVAAS student growth index
score from the previous school year of exceeded expected growth in
one of the following subject areas:
1. Third grade reading.
2. Fourth or fifth grade reading.
House Bill 1163-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
3. Fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics.
(4) EVAAS. – The Education Value-Added Assessment System.
(5) Predecessor bonus programs. – All of the following:
a. The Advanced Placement/International Baccalaureate/Cambridge
AICE Teacher Bonus Program provided in Section 8.8 of S.L.
2016-94, as amended by Section 8.8B of S.L. 2017-57, Section 2.10
of S.L. 2017-197, and Section 8.10 of S.L. 2018-5.
b. The Industry Certifications and Credentials Teacher Bonus Program
provided in Section 8.9 of S.L. 2016-94, as amended by Section 8.8B
of S.L. 2017-57, Section 2.10 of S.L. 2017-197, and Section 8.10 of
S.L. 2018-5.
c. The Third Grade Read to Achieve Teacher Bonus Program provided
in Section 8.8C of S.L. 2017-57, as amended by Section 2.10 of S.L.
2017-197 and Section 8.10 of S.L. 2018-5.
d. The Fourth and Fifth Grade Reading Teacher Bonus Program provided
in Section 8.8D of S.L. 2017-57, as amended by Section 8.11 of S.L.
2018-5.
e. The Fourth to Eighth Grade Math Teacher Bonus Program provided
in Section 8.8E of S.L. 2017-57, as amended by Section 8.12 of S.L.
2018-5.
f. Advanced course and CTE Teacher bonuses provided in Section 7A.4
of S.L. 2021-180.
g. Bonuses for Teachers Based on Student Growth provided in Section
7A.2 of S.L. 2022-74.
h. The Consolidated Teacher Bonus Program provided in Section 7A.3
of S.L. 2023-134.
(6) Qualifying public school unit. – Any of the following:
a. A local school administrative unit.
b. A charter school.
c. A regional school.
d. A school providing elementary or secondary instruction operated by
The University of North Carolina under Article 29A of Chapter 116 of
the General Statutes.
(7) Qualifying teacher. – An eligible teacher who meets one of the following
criteria:
a. Remains employed teaching in the same qualifying public school unit
or, if an eligible advanced course teacher is only employed by the
North Carolina Virtual Public School program, remains employed
teaching in that program, at least from the school year the data is
collected until January 1 of the corresponding school year that the
bonus is paid.
b. Retired, between the last day of the school year in which the data is
collected and January 1 of the corresponding school year in which the
bonus is paid, after attaining one of the following:
1. The age of at least 65 with five years of creditable service.
2. The age of at least 60 with 25 years of creditable service.
3. Thirty years of creditable service.
(c) Advanced Course Bonuses. – A bonus in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be
provided to qualifying advanced course teachers for each student taught in each advanced course
who receives the following score:
Page 8 House Bill 1163-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) For Advanced Placement courses, a score of three or higher on the College
Board Advanced Placement Examination.
(2) For International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme courses, a score of four
or higher on the International Baccalaureate course examination.
(3) For the Cambridge AICE program, a score of "E" or higher on the Cambridge
AICE program examinations.
(d) CTE Bonuses. – For qualifying career and technical education teachers, bonuses shall
be provided in the following amounts:
(1) A bonus in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each student taught
by a teacher who provided instruction in a course that led to the attainment of
an industry certification or credential with a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) value
ranking as determined under subsection (e) of this section.
(2) A bonus in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each student taught by a
teacher who provided instruction in a course that led to the attainment of an
industry certification or credential with a fifty dollar ($50.00) value ranking
as determined under subsection (e) of this section.
(e) CTE Course Value Ranking. – The Department of Commerce, in consultation with
the North Carolina Workforce Credentials Advisory Council, shall assign a value ranking for
each industry certification and credential based on academic rigor and employment value in
accordance with this subsection. Fifty percent (50%) of the ranking shall be based on academic
rigor and the remaining fifty percent (50%) on employment value. Academic rigor and
employment value shall be based on the following elements:
(1) Academic rigor shall be based on the number of instructional hours, including
work experience or internship hours, required to earn the industry certification
or credential, with extra weight given for coursework that also provides
community college credit.
(2) Employment value shall be based on the entry wage, growth rate in
employment for each occupational category, and average annual openings for
the primary occupation linked with the industry certification or credential.
(f) Statewide Growth Bonuses. – The Department shall provide bonuses to qualifying
teachers who are eligible teachers under sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b)
of this section, as follows:
(1) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated for bonuses to
eligible teachers under sub-sub-subdivision a.1. of subdivision (3) of
subsection (b) of this section. These funds shall be distributed equally among
qualifying teachers.
(2) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
a.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
(3) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
a.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
(g) Local Growth Bonuses. – The Department shall provide bonuses to eligible teachers
under sub-subdivisions b. and c. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section, as follows:
(1) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated for bonuses to
eligible EVAAS teachers under sub-sub-subdivisions b.1. and c.1. of
subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section. These funds shall be divided
proportionally based on average daily membership in third grade for each
local school administrative unit and then distributed equally among qualifying
third grade reading teachers in each local school administrative unit.
House Bill 1163-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
b.2. or c.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
(3) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
b.3. or c.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
(h) Limitations and Other Criteria. – The following additional limitations and other
criteria shall apply to the program:
(1) Bonus funds awarded to a teacher pursuant to subsection (c), subsection (d),
subdivision (1) of subsection (f), and subdivision (1) of subsection (g) of this
section shall not exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000) per subsection or
subdivision in any given school year.
(2) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.1.,
b.1., or c.1. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (1) of subsection (f) and subdivision (1) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than seven thousand
dollars ($7,000) pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (f) and subdivision
(1) of subsection (g) of this section in any given school year.
(3) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.2.,
b.2., or c.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (2) of subsection (f) and subdivision (2) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than two bonuses
pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (f) and subdivision (2) of subsection
(g) of this section in any given school year.
(4) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.3.,
b.3., or c.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (3) of subsection (f) and subdivision (3) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than two bonuses
pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (f) and subdivision (3) of subsection
(g) of this section in any given school year.
(i) Bonuses Not Compensation. – Bonuses awarded to a teacher pursuant to this section
shall be in addition to any regular wage or other bonus the teacher receives or is scheduled to
receive. Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the bonuses awarded under this section are not
compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, Retirement System for
Teachers and State Employees.
(j) Study and Report. – The North Carolina Collaboratory (Collaboratory) shall study the
effect of the program on teacher performance and retention. The Collaboratory shall report the
results of its findings and the amount of bonuses awarded to the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division by March 15 of each year. The report shall include,
at a minimum, the following information:
(1) Number of students enrolled and taking examinations in each of the following
categories of courses:
a. Advanced Placement.
b. International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme.
c. Cambridge AICE program.
d. Courses needed for the attainment of an industry certification or
credential.
(2) Number of students receiving outcomes on examinations resulting in the
award of a bonus for a teacher in each category of courses identified in
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
Page 10 House Bill 1163-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Number of teachers receiving a bonus in each category of courses identified
in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(4) The amounts awarded to teachers for each category of courses identified in
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(5) The type of industry certifications and credentials earned by the students, the
value ranking for each certification and credential, the number of bonuses
earned for each certification or credential, and the total bonus amount awarded
for each certification or credential.
(6) Average bonus amount awarded to each qualifying teacher who is an eligible
teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.1., b.1., or c.1. of subdivision (3) of
subsection (b) of this section.
(7) The percentage of teachers who received a bonus pursuant to this section and
were eligible to receive a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or course
in either or both of the prior two school years pursuant to this section or a
predecessor bonus program.
(8) The percentage of teachers who received a bonus pursuant to this section and
received a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or course in either or
both of the prior two school years pursuant to this section or a predecessor
bonus program.
(9) The statistical relationship between a teacher receiving a bonus pursuant to
this section and receiving a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or
course in one or more prior school years pursuant to this section or a
predecessor bonus program.
(10) The distribution of statewide and local growth bonuses awarded pursuant to
this section as among qualifying public school units and, where applicable,
schools within those units."
SECTION 8.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies beginning
with bonuses awarded in January of 2028 based on data from the 2026-2027 school year.

PART IX. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
House Bill 1163-First Edition Page 11